Hawaii statutes.
[§10H-9]
Disclaimer. Nothing in this chapter is
intended to serve as a settlement of any claims against the State of Hawaii, or
affect the rights of the Native Hawaiian people under state, federal, or
international law. [L 2011, c 195, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next